Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Council and Mayor Generally

6-32-101. Regular meetings.

The council shall hold regular meetings at least twice monthly. These meetings shall be held on the second and fourth Tuesdays of each month unless otherwise provided by ordinance; provided, that if a regular meeting date falls on a legal holiday, the meeting shall be held the following day. The council shall provide by resolution for the time of day and place of its meetings. However at the option of the council, an ordinance may be adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its entire membership to hold regular council meetings once monthly.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.01; T.C.A., § 6-3201; Acts 1993, ch. 353, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-32-102. Special meetings.

Special meetings shall be called by the clerk on the written request of the mayor, the manager, or any two (2) council members by providing each council member with twenty-four (24) hours written notice served personally or left at each of such council member's usual place of residence. Any special meeting at which all members of the council are present or have waived notice thereof in writing shall be a legal meeting for all purposes. Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to subjects recited in the notice of such meeting.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.02; T.C.A., § 6-3202.

6-32-103. Meetings to be public.

All council meetings shall be open to the public and citizens shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard. The council shall exercise its powers only at public meetings.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.03; T.C.A., § 6-3203.

6-32-104. Quorum.

At least one half (½) of the members of the council shall be a quorum for the transaction of business at all council meetings, but, in the absence of a quorum, three (3) members may adjourn the meeting to a later date or may compel the attendance of absent members.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.04; T.C.A., § 6-3204.

Collateral References.

Abstention from voting of members of municipal council present at session as affecting requisite voting majority. 63 A.L.R.3d 1072.

6-32-105. Attendance and conduct at meetings.

The council may enforce orderly conduct and compel the attendance of its members and other city officers at its meetings. Any member of the council or other officer of the city who refuses to attend meetings when served with notice or acts in a disorderly manner at such meetings commits misconduct in office. Upon council request, the manager shall designate a police official or officer to serve as the sergeant-at-arms of the council.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.05; T.C.A., § 6-3205.

6-32-106. Mayor.

The council, at its first regular meeting following a regular city election, shall elect one (1) of its members mayor for a term of two (2) years. Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of the mayor, the council shall elect one (1) of its members to serve until its first regular meeting following the next regular city election.

The mayor shall:

Preside at meetings of the council;

Have a vote on all matters but no veto power;

Be the ceremonial head of the city;

Sign ordinances and resolutions on their final passage;

Sign deeds, bonds and contracts when authorized by the council to do so;

Be the officer to accept process against the city;

Not have any regular administrative duties; and

Perform only such duties as shall be specifically conferred or required by law.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.06; T.C.A., § 6-3206.

6-32-107. Mayor pro tem.

The council shall choose one (1) of its members mayor pro tem who shall act in the temporary absence or disability of the mayor.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.07; T.C.A., § 6-3207.

6-32-108. Council rules — Transaction of business.

The council shall determine its own rules and order of business subject to the following provisions:

The affirmative vote of at least one half (½) of the members of the council shall be required to make any authorized appointment or remove such appointees;

All other actions, except those listed in §§ 6-32-102 and 6-32-104, may be passed by the affirmative vote of a majority of those present when there is a quorum;

There shall be a journal of the proceedings of all council meetings, signed by the mayor and clerk and to which the public shall have access at all reasonable times;

A summary of council proceedings shall be published in the official city newspaper within fifteen (15) days after a meeting, showing the substance of each council action;

A vote upon all proposed ordinances and resolutions shall be taken by “yea” and “nay” vote and the vote of each council member entered upon the journal, except that where the vote is unanimous it shall be necessary only to so state;

The journal shall also report the names of the council members present and absent, each motion considered, and the title of each ordinance or resolution considered; and

There shall be no standing committee of the council.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.08; T.C.A. § 6-3208.

Collateral References.

What constitutes requisite majority of members of municipal council voting on issue. 43 A.L.R.2d 698.

6-32-109. Powers of council.

The council may by resolution subpoena and examine witnesses, order the production of books and papers, and shall have the same powers as a circuit court to punish for refusal to obey such an order or subpoena or for disorderly or contemptuous behavior in the presence of the council. Its presiding officer may administer oaths to witnesses.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.09; T.C.A., § 6-3209.

6-32-110. Compensation of council and mayor.

Each member of the council shall be compensated at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) per meeting attended but not to exceed one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per year. At the option of the council, an ordinance may be adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its entire membership to fix the compensation of members of the council at an amount not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month, and the council person serving as mayor not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) per month, to take effect at the end of the term of the council person whose term last expires.

The mayor shall receive the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) per month, in addition to the mayor's compensation as council member.

All members of the council may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of their official duties; provided, that such expenses are approved by the council at one of its regular meetings.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 4.10; T.C.A., § 6-3210; Acts 1993, ch. 353, § 5.

Cross-References. Councilmen, minimum salaries in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 7-51-302.

Chief elected executive, minimum compensation in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 7-51-301.